ru: Покрытие подшипника двигателя: Медно-свинцовое покрытие; Алмазоподобное углеродное покрытие (DLC); Молибденовое покрытие; Покрытие PTFE (Teflon); Полимерное покрытие; Лужение; Трехслойное металлическое покрытие; Без покрытия; Другое
pt-BR: Revestimento de mancal do motor: Revestimento de cobre e chumbo; Revestimento de carbono tipo diamante (DLC); Revestimento de molibdênio; Revestimento de PTFE (Teflon); Revestimento de polímero; Revestimento de estanho; Revestimento trimetálico; Sem revestimento; Outro
lt-LT: Variklio guolių danga: Vario ir švino danga; Į deimantą panašios anglies (DLC) danga; Molibdeno danga; PTFE (teflono) danga; Polimerinė danga; Alavo danga; Trimetalė danga; Be dangos; Kita
cs: Povlak ložiska motoru: Povlak měď-olovo; Povlak DLC (uhlík podobný diamantu); Molybdenový povlak; Povlak PTFE (Teflon); Polymerový povlak; Cínování; Trimetalový povlak; Bez povlaku; Jiné
fi: Moottorin laakerin pinnoite: Kupari-lyijypinnoite; Timanttimainen hiilipinnoite (DLC); Molybdeenipinnoite (moly); PTFE-pinnoite (Teflon); Polymeeripinnoite; Tinapinnoite; Kolmimetallipinnoite; Pinnoittamaton; Muu
da: Belægning på motorleje: Kobber-bly-overlejring; DLC-belægning (diamond-like carbon); Molybdæn-belægning (moly); PTFE-belægning (Teflon); Polymerbelægning; Fortinning; Trimetal-overlejring; Ubehandlet; Andet
zh-CN: 发动机轴承涂层: 铜铅覆盖层; 类金刚石碳（DLC）涂层; 钼涂层; PTFE（Teflon）涂层; 聚合物涂层; 镀锡; 三金属覆盖层; 无涂层; 其他
tr: Motor yatağı kaplaması: Bakır-kurşun kaplama; Elmas benzeri karbon (DLC) kaplama; Molibden kaplama; PTFE (Teflon) kaplama; Polimer kaplama; Kalay kaplama; Trimetal kaplama; Kaplamasız; Diğer
fr: Revêtement des paliers de moteur: Superposition cuivre-plomb; Revêtement en carbone de type diamant (DLC); Revêtement en molybdène; Revêtement en PTFE (Teflon); Revêtement polymère; Étamage; Superposition trimétallique; Non revêtu; Autre
bg-BG: Покритие на лагер на двигател: Медно-оловно покритие; Диамантоподобно въглеродно (DLC) покритие; Молибденово покритие; PTFE (тефлон) покритие; Полимерно покритие; Калаено покритие; Триметално покритие; Без покритие; Друго
pl: Powłoka łożyska silnika: Powłoka miedziano-ołowiowa; Powłoka z węgla diamentopodobnego (DLC); Powłoka molibdenowa; Powłoka PTFE (Teflon); Powłoka polimerowa; Powłoka cynowa; Powłoka trójmetalowa; Bez powłoki; Inne
de: Motorlagerbeschichtung: Kupfer-Blei-Beschichtung; Diamond-Like Carbon (DLC)-Beschichtung; Molybdän-Beschichtung; PTFE (Teflon)-Beschichtung; Polymerbeschichtung; Verzinnung; Trimetall-Beschichtung; Unbeschichtet; Sonstige
nb: Overflatebehandling for motorlager: Kobber-bly-overlegg; DLC-belegg (diamantlignende karbon); Molybdenbelegg (moly); PTFE-belegg (Teflon); Polymerbelegg; Tinnbelegg; Trimetall-overlegg; Ubehandlet; Annet
sk-SK: Povlak ložísk motora: Medeno-olovená vrstva; Povlak na báze diamantu (DLC); Molybdénový (moly) povlak; Povlak PTFE (Teflon); Polymérový povlak; Cínovanie; Trimetalová vrstva; Bez povlaku; Iné
hr-HR: Premaz ležaja motora: Sloj bakra i olova; Premaz od ugljika sličnog dijamantu (DLC); Premaz od molibdena (moly); Premaz od PTFE-a (Teflon); Polimerni premaz; Premaz od kositra; Trimetalni sloj; Bez premaza; Ostalo
it: Rivestimento del cuscinetto del motore: Rivestimento in rame-piombo; Rivestimento in carbonio diamantato (DLC); Rivestimento in molibdeno; Rivestimento in PTFE (Teflon); Rivestimento in polimero; Placcatura in stagno; Rivestimento trimetallico; Non rivestito; Altro
hu: Motorcsapágy bevonata: Réz-ólom bevonat; Gyémántszerű szén (DLC) bevonat; Molibdén bevonat; PTFE (Teflon) bevonat; Polimer bevonat; Ónbevonat; Trimetál bevonat; Bevonat nélküli; Egyéb
es: Revestimiento de cojinetes de motor: Sobreposición de cobre y plomo; Revestimiento de carbono como diamante (DLC); Revestimiento de molibdeno (moly); Revestimiento de PTFE (Teflon); Revestimiento de polímero; Revestimiento de estaño; Sobreposición trimetálica; Sin revestimiento; Otro
ja: エンジンベアリングコーティング: 銅鉛オーバーレイ; ダイヤモンドライクカーボン (DLC) コーティング; モリブデン (モリ) コーティング; PTFE (Teflon) コーティング; ポリマーコーティング; スズメッキ; トリメタルオーバーレイ; コーティングなし; その他
th: การเคลือบผิวแบริ่งเครื่องยนต์: เคลือบทองแดง-ตะกั่ว; การเคลือบคาร์บอนคล้ายเพชร (DLC); การเคลือบโมลิบดีนัม (Moly); การเคลือบ PTFE (Teflon); การเคลือบโพลิเมอร์; การชุบดีบุก; เคลือบไตรเมทัล; ไม่เคลือบ; อื่นๆ
vi: Lớp phủ bạc lót động cơ: Lớp phủ đồng-chì; Lớp phủ carbon dạng kim cương (DLC); Lớp phủ molybdenum (moly); Lớp phủ PTFE (Teflon); Lớp phủ polymer; Mạ thiếc; Lớp phủ ba kim loại; Không phủ; Khác
sv: Beläggning på motorns lager: Koppar-blyöverdrag; DLC-beläggning (diamantliknande kol); Molybdenbeläggning (moly); PTFE-beläggning (Teflon); Polymerbeläggning; Förtenning; Trimetallöverdrag; Obelagd; Annat
nl: Lagercoating motor: Koper-lood overlay; Diamond-like carbon (DLC)-coating; Molybdeen (moly)-coating; PTFE (Teflon)-coating; Polymeercoating; Tinlaag; Trimetaal overlay; Ongecoat; Overig
sl-SI: Premaz ležaja motorja: Prevleka iz bakra in svinca; Prevleka, podobna diamantu (DLC); Molibdenova prevleka (moly); Prevleka iz PTFE (Teflon); Polimerna prevleka; Kositrna prevleka; Trislojna kovinska prevleka; Brez prevleke; Drugo
zh-TW: 引擎軸承塗層: 銅鉛疊加層; 類鑽石碳 (DLC) 塗層; 鉬塗層; PTFE (Teflon) 塗層; 聚合物塗層; 鍍錫; 三金屬疊加層; 無塗層; 其他
ko: 엔진 베어링 코팅: 구리-납 오버레이; 다이아몬드상 카본(DLC) 코팅; 몰리브덴(몰리) 코팅; PTFE(Teflon) 코팅; 폴리머 코팅; 주석 도금; 트라이메탈 오버레이; 코팅 없음; 기타
ro-RO: Acoperirea lagărelor motorului: Acoperire cu cupru-plumb; Acoperire cu carbon tip diamant (DLC); Acoperire cu molibden (moly); Acoperire din PTFE (Teflon); Acoperire cu polimeri; Placare cu staniu; Acoperire trimetalică; Fără acoperire; Altele
en: Engine bearing coating: Copper-lead overlay; Diamond-like carbon (DLC) coating; Molybdenum (moly) coating; PTFE (Teflon) coating; Polymer coating; Tin plating; Tri-metal overlay; Uncoated; Other
pt-PT: Revestimento dos rolamentos do motor: Sobreposição de cobre e chumbo; Revestimento de carbono tipo diamante (DLC); Revestimento de molibdénio (moly); Revestimento de PTFE (Teflon); Revestimento de polímero; Revestimento de estanho; Sobreposição trimetálica; Sem revestimento; Outro
el: Επίστρωση ρουλεμάν κινητήρα: Επικάλυψη χαλκού-μολύβδου; Επίστρωση άνθρακα με ιδιότητες διαμαντιού (DLC); Επίστρωση μολυβδαινίου (moly); Επίστρωση PTFE (Teflon); Επίστρωση πολυμερούς; Επικασσιτέρωση; Τριμεταλλική επικάλυψη; Χωρίς επίστρωση; Άλλο